Utah statutes.
9-4-615.   Victims of major disaster.
(1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this or any other law relating to
rentals, preferences, or eligibility for admission or occupancy of dwellings
in housing projects during the period an authority determines that there is an
acute need for housing to assure the availability of dwellings for victims of
a major disaster, the authority may undertake the development and
administration of housing projects for the federal government, and dwellings
in any housing project under the jurisdiction of the authority may be made
available to victims of a major disaster.
(2)  An authority may contract with the federal government or a public body
for advance payment or reimbursement for the furnishing of housing to victims
of a major disaster, including the furnishing of housing free of charge to
needy disaster victims during any period covered by a determination of acute
need by the authority.
